California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) Whose rehabilitation and reformation requires short-term confinement followed by intensive probation supervision. The juvenile court may in its discretion commit any eligible ward of the juvenile court to the youth correctional center program and any criminal court may in its discretion commit any eligible offender to the youth correctional center program as a condition of probation, except that no commitment shall be placed into effect until the chief probation officer has certified to the committing court that the youth correctional center has adequate facilities to provide rehabilitative treatment for the offender.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1854.

While under commitment to the youth correctional center, the offender is subject to the control of the chief probation officer. The offender may be confined to the center at all times; he may be released for brief periods to work, attend school, or engage in educational or recreational pursuits; or he may be allowed to live in the community and return to the center for specific services as directed by the chief probation officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.

Earnings of offenders who reside in the center and work in the community shall be collected by the chief probation officer. From such earnings the chief probation officer may pay the offender’s board and personal expenses and such administrative costs as are allocable to him. Any balance may be paid periodically to the offender as deemed appropriate by the chief probation officer. Upon the offender’s release from juvenile court wardship or termination of his probation, all funds credited to his account shall be paid to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1856.

When in the opinion of the chief probation officer an offender appears to be unamenable to the program of the youth correctional center, he shall be returned to the committing court for further disposition. The court shall then make an alternative disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.

The Board of Corrections shall adopt and prescribe the minimum standards of construction, operation, programs of education or rehabilitative training or treatment, and qualifications of personnel for youth correctional centers established pursuant to this article. No county establishing or conducting such a youth correctional center shall be entitled to receive any state funds provided for in this article unless and until the minimum standards and qualifications referred to in this section are complied with by such county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 12, Sec. 15.   Effective February 14, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.

No youth correctional center established pursuant to this article shall be planned to accommodate more than 350 youths under supervision at any one time. Any youth correctional center that consistently exceeds this capacity shall be ineligible to receive subsidy funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1859.

Where any such youth correctional center is established, and where the minimum standards and qualifications provided for in Section 1857 have been complied with by the county, the State of California through the Youth Authority, out of any money appropriated for this purpose, shall reimburse the county at the rate of two hundred dollars ($200) per month per person being supervised by the youth correctional center during the first six months of such person’s first-time participation in the center program. This amount shall be adjusted annually, upward or downward, by the Director of Finance in accordance with the proportionate increase or decrease in per capita costs for supervising Youth Authority wards in institutions and on parole.

Whenever a claim made by a county pursuant to this section covering a prior fiscal year is found to have been in error, adjustment may be made on a current claim without necessity of applying the adjustment to the appropriation for the prior fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.

(a) From any state moneys made available to it for that purpose, the Youth Authority shall share in the cost pursuant to this article of the construction of youth correctional centers established by counties which apply therefor. 

(b) “Construction” as used in this section includes construction of new buildings and acquisition of existing buildings and initial equipment of any such buildings, and, to the extent provided for in regulations adopted by the Department of the Youth Authority, remodeling of existing buildings owned by the county, to serve as a youth correctional center, and initial equipment thereof. “Construction” also includes payments made by a county under any lease-purchase agreement or similar arrangement authorized by law and payments for the necessary repair or improvements of property which is leased from the federal government or other public entity without cost to the county for a term of not less than 10 years. It does not include architects’ fees or the cost of land acquisition.

(c) The amount of state assistance which shall be provided to any county shall not exceed 50 percent of the project cost approved by the Youth Authority and in no event shall it exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) per offender the program is designed to accommodate.

(d) Application for state assistance for construction funds under this article shall be made to the Youth Authority in the manner and form prescribed by the Youth Authority, and the Youth Authority shall prescribe the time and manner of payment of state assistance, if granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall report to the Legislature no later than the fifth legislative day of the 1974 Regular Session on the experiences and the results under the provisions of this article. Pending review by the Legislature of such report, the state shall not participate financially in the establishment of more than four youth correctional centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Youth Service Bureaus [1900. - 1905.]

1900.

The Legislature hereby finds that the most significant trend in the development of delinquency prevention programs has been in the direction of multipurpose youth service bureau projects implemented at the neighborhood level, receiving delinquent and predelinquent youth referred by parents, schools, police, probation, and other agencies, as well as self-referral. Designed especially for less seriously delinquent youth, programmatic aspects often include group and individual counseling, work and recreation programs, employment counseling, special education, utilization of paraprofessionals and volunteers, outreach services, and youth participation in the decisionmaking process. Often activities encouraging youths’ families, local community citizens, and representatives of established agencies are included in project activities. While youth service bureau programs have been effective in diverting youth out of the justice system, it has also been the case that these programs have been hampered in their operations due to lack of consistent and stable funding. Therefore, it is proposed that a significant number of youth service bureaus be established throughout the state and be located in areas with a high concentration of vulnerable youth, by means of a cost-sharing plan between local communities and the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

Pursuant to the provisions of this article, any public or private organization may make application to the Department of the Youth Authority for the purpose of receiving funding from the Department of the Youth Authority for the establishment or operation or both of one or more youth service bureaus. Such youth service bureaus shall develop and operate direct and indirect service programs designed to:

(a) Divert young people from the justice system;

(b) Prevent delinquent behavior by young people;

(c) Provide opportunities for young people to function as responsible members of their communities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

(a) The Department of the Youth Authority shall develop, adopt, prescribe, monitor and enforce minimum standards for youth service bureaus funded under the provisions of this article. Such standards shall be for the purposes of carrying out, and not inconsistent with, the provisions of this article.

(b) The Department of the Youth Authority shall seek advice from knowledgeable individuals, groups and agencies in the development of such standards.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

Application for funding of youth service bureaus under the provisions of this article shall be made in the manner prescribed by the Department of the Youth Authority.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

From any state moneys made available to it for such purpose, the Department of the Youth Authority shall, in accordance with this article, share in the cost of each youth service bureau meeting the standards prescribed for youth service bureaus by the department at the rate of 50 percent of the actual fiscal year costs of each youth service bureau, or eighty-seven thousand two hundred dollars ($87,200) per fiscal year for each youth service bureau, whichever amount is the lesser.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the grant of a cost-of-living increase to youth service bureaus. It shall be determined in the annual Budget Act whether local matching funds shall be required with any cost-of-living increase granted from the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1201, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

Each youth service bureau funded under this article shall maintain accurate and complete case records, reports, statistics and other information necessary for the conduct of its programs; establish appropriate written policies and procedures to protect the confidentiality of individual client records; and submit monthly reports to the Department of the Youth Authority concerning services and activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1159.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Classification and Information System [1910. - 1913.]

1910.

The Legislature hereby finds that wards are committed to the Department of the Youth Authority at rates and for seriousness of risks and needs which vary considerably from county to county. Current law requires the Department of the Youth Authority to accept a person committed to it if it believes that the person can be materially benefited by its reformatory and educational discipline, and if it has adequate facilities to provide that care. The Legislature also finds that, with an increasing youth population in California, some persons committed to the department may not be accepted because of insufficient facilities. Further, objective systems for classifying the risks posed by a minor and the needs of the minor for training and treatment can increase the equity in acceptance decisions and allocate custody and services to the minors throughout the state who can most materially benefit from a Youth Authority commitment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 452, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1911.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall, as resources are available, develop and implement a system to classify persons committed to the department. In developing this classification system, the Department of the Youth Authority shall consult with the Association of Chief Probation Officers of California and the Juvenile Court Judges section of the California Judges Association. This classification system shall include objective categories to assess the risks and needs of each person committed to the Department of the Youth Authority. The aggregate information from the classification system shall become the basis for the development of standardized criteria to determine suitability for commitment to the Department of the Youth Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 452, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1912.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall, as resources are available, conduct an assessment of the feasibility and costs of developing and implementing a statewide juvenile information system, to include information on the offenses, characteristics, and dispositions of individual youths from referral to probation through discharge from the Department of the Youth Authority and for a period of time after discharge. This system shall be designed to ensure that the Department of the Youth Authority receives the information needed for each person committed to it, in order to plan properly for his or her program of training and treatment. This system shall also be designed to permit the Department of the Youth Authority to obtain information on subsequent offenses and other characteristics after release from Youth Authority institutions and after discharge from parole, for use in evaluating the department’s programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 452, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1913.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall seek federal funds and funds from other sources to develop the classification system and to assess the feasibility of a statewide juvenile information system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 452, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Tattoo Removal [1915. - 1915.]

1915.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities shall purchase, after a competitive bidding process, two medical devices that utilize a laser to remove a tattoo from a person’s skin. The department shall determine, through a competitive bidding process, the placement of the two medical devices pursuant to the following guidelines:

(1) One of the medical devices shall be located within Los Angeles County and the other shall be located within one of the following counties: Alameda, San Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Clara, and Santa Cruz.

(2) Possible sites may include: a licensed health facility, a licensed health clinic, an
 educational institution, or a probation office. The department may enter into an agreement with a licensed health facility to permit the health facility to use the medical device when it is not needed for tattoo removal pursuant to this section if the health facility provides tattoo removal services pursuant to this section free of charge.

(3) The medical devices shall remain the property of the state. However, they shall be used in conjunction with the tattoo removal program pursuant to this section for the functional life of the medical devices.

(b) Candidates for tattoo removal shall be screened by community groups working collaboratively with the operators of the sites of the tattoo removal devices. A male candidate for tattoo removal shall have a tattoo on his lower arm, hand, neck, or head. A female candidate for tattoo removal shall have a tattoo that would be visible in a
 professional work environment. To be eligible for participation, the presence of the tattoo must be deemed to present either a threat to the personal safety of, or an obstacle to the employability of, the candidate. Priority shall be given to candidates who have a job offer that is contingent upon removal of the tattoo. At the discretion of the organization that screens a candidate, a candidate for this tattoo removal may be required to complete 20 hours of supervised public service work in order to participate in this program. Parental consent shall be required before the tattoo of any person under 18 years of age is removed.

Community groups recommended pursuant to this subdivision shall meet the following criteria:

(1) Serve at-risk youth, ex-offenders, ex-convicts, current and former gang members, or victims of trafficking and prostitution.

(2) Possess an established record of providing community-based services for at least one year to the persons described in paragraph (1).

(c) Community groups that participate in this program and the operators of the sites of the tattoo removal devices shall solicit the pro bono services of licensed health care providers to participate in the program in order to increase the number of individuals served.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that at least 200 tattoo removals shall be performed at each tattoo removal site in its first year of operation. After two years of operation, community groups that participate in this program and the operators of each site shall report to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities on the number of tattoo removals performed by each device and the success of the program in assisting
 individuals to join the workforce. By March 1, 2000, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities shall report these findings to the Legislature.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to expand these pilot programs as rapidly as possible to other areas of the state where there is gang violence and where there are active community-based gang violence prevention programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 746, Sec. 1.   (AB 1956)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Youthful Offender Block Grant Program [1950. - 1978.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1950. - 1956.]

1950.

The purpose of this chapter is to enhance the capacity of local communities to implement an effective continuum of response to juvenile crime and delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 30.   Effective August 24, 2007.   Operative September 1, 2007, by Sec. 37 of Ch. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.

(a) There is hereby established the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund.

(b) Allocations from the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund shall be used to enhance the capacity of county probation, mental health, drug and alcohol, and other county departments to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services to youthful offenders subject to Sections 731.1, 733, 1766, and 1767.35. Counties, in expending the Youthful Offender Block Grant allocation, shall provide all necessary services related to the custody and parole of the offenders.

(c) The county of commitment is relieved of obligation for any payment to the state pursuant to Section 912
 for each offender who is not committed to the custody of the state solely pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 733, and for each offender who is supervised by the county of commitment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1766 or subdivision (b) of Section 1767.35.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 36, Sec. 81.5.   (SB 92)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Operative December 13, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 84 of Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.

For the 2007–08 fiscal year, all of the following shall apply:

(a) An amount equal to the total of all of the following shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund:

(1) One hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($117,000) per ward multiplied by the average daily population (ADP) for the year for wards who are not committed to the custody of the state pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 733, and Sections 731.1 and 1767.35.

(2) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per parolee multiplied by the ADP for the year for parolees who are supervised by the county of commitment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1766.

(3) An amount equal to 5 percent of the total of paragraphs (1) and (2). This amount shall be reserved by the Controller for distribution by the Department of Finance, upon recommendation of the Corrections Standards Authority, in collaboration with the Division of Juvenile Facilities, for unforeseen circumstances associated with the implementation of the act that added this chapter. This amount is a one-time allocation and shall not be built into the base described in subdivision (a) of Section 1953 unless the Department of Finance finds a continuation of unforeseen circumstances. A county that wishes to seek funds from this reserved amount shall submit a request to the Corrections Standards Authority that outlines the unusual circumstances that exist in the county and why the county’s Youthful Offender Block Grant is inadequate to meet the county financial needs to accommodate and supervise youthful offenders pursuant to the act that added this chapter. The Corrections Standards Authority shall submit its recommendation to the Department of Finance for approval.

(b) Any portion of the funds described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) that is unused during the 2007–08 fiscal year shall revert to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 257, Sec. 7.   Effective September 29, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.

For the 2008–09 fiscal year, the total of the following amounts shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund:

(a) The amount transferred to the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund for the 2007–08 fiscal year, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1952, adjusted to account for full-year impacts.

(b) One hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($117,000) per ward multiplied by the ADP for the year for wards who are not committed to the custody of the state pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 733, and Sections 731.1 and 1767.35.

(c) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per parolee multiplied by the ADP for the year for parolees who are supervised by the county of commitment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1766.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 257, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.5.

For the 2009–10 fiscal year, the total of the following amounts shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund:

(a) The amount transferred to the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund for the 2008–09 fiscal year, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1952, adjusted to account for full-year impacts.

(b) One hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($117,000) per ward multiplied by the ADP for the year for wards who are not committed to the custody of the state pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 733, and Sections 731.1 and 1767.35.

(c) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per parolee multiplied by the ADP for the year for parolees who are supervised by the county of commitment pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1766.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 257, Sec. 9.   Effective September 29, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.1.

For each fiscal year, the Director of Finance shall determine the total amount of the Youthful Offender Block Grant and the allocation for each county, pursuant to Sections 1955 and 1956, and shall report those findings to the Controller. The Controller shall make an allocation from the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund to each county in accordance with the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 257, Sec. 11.   Effective September 29, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1955.

(a) The allocation amount for each county from the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund for offenders subject to Sections 733, 1766, and 1767.35 shall be allocated in four equal installments, to be paid in September, December, March, and June of each fiscal year, until June 30, 2013. Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the allocation amount for each county from the Youthful Offender Block Grant Special Account established in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 30025 of the Government Code for offenders subject to Sections 733, 1766, and 1767.35 shall be allocated in monthly installments. In each fiscal year, the allocation amount shall be determined as follows:

(1) Fifty percent based on the number of the county’s juvenile felony court dispositions,
 calculated as a percentage of the state total. By July 10 of each year, the Department of Justice shall provide to the Department of Finance the number of juvenile felony court dispositions for each county for the previous calendar year.

(2) Fifty percent based on the county’s population of minors from 10 to 17 years of age, inclusive, according to the most recent data published by the Department of Finance, calculated as a percentage of the state total.

(b) Each county shall receive a minimum block grant allocation of fifty-eight thousand five hundred dollars ($58,500) for the 2007–08 fiscal year, and a minimum block grant allocation of one hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($117,000) for each fiscal year thereafter.

(c) Commencing with the 2008–09 fiscal year, allocations shall be available to counties that have
 met the requirements of Section 1961.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 39.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1955.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1731.5, when an individual under 18 years of age is convicted of an offense in superior court on or after July 1, 2021, and sentenced to state prison, that individual shall remain in a county juvenile facility until the individual reaches 18 years of age and may be transferred to state prison. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall pay a daily rate of six hundred fourteen dollars and forty-four cents ($616.44) to a county for the number of days a qualifying individual is in a local juvenile facility. This section only applies once an individual has been convicted and is under 18 years of age. This section does not require the county of conviction to enter into a contract with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for the care and custody of the individuals
 described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 48.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1956.

The allocation for any eligible county from the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund for offenders subject to Section 731.1 shall be determined by the Department of Finance, consistent with the ADP methodology and fiscal parameters used in Sections 1952, 1953, and 1953.5, for the corresponding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 257, Sec. 13.   Effective September 29, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Performance and Accountability [1960. - 1962.]

1960.

The Legislature finds and declares that local youthful offender justice programs, including both custodial and noncustodial corrective services, are better suited to provide rehabilitative services for certain youthful offenders than state-operated facilities. Local communities are better able than the state to provide these offenders with the programs they require, in closer proximity to their families and communities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Implementing risk and needs assessment tools and evaluations to assist in the identification of appropriate youthful offender dispositions and reentry plans.

(b) Placements in secure and semisecure youthful offender rehabilitative facilities and in private residential care programs, with or without foster care waivers, supporting specialized programs for youthful offenders.

(c) Nonresidential dispositions such as day or evening treatment programs, community service, restitution, and drug-alcohol and other counseling programs based on an offender’s assessed risks and needs.

(d) House arrest, electronic monitoring, and intensive probation supervision programs.

(e) Reentry and aftercare programs based on individual aftercare plans for each offender who is released from a public or private placement or confinement facility.

(f) Capacity building strategies to upgrade the training and qualifications of juvenile justice and probation personnel serving the juvenile justice caseload.

(g) Regional program and placement networks, including direct brokering and placement locating networks to facilitate out-of-county dispositions for counties lacking programs or facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 30.   Effective August 24, 2007.   Operative September 1, 2007, by Sec. 37 of Ch. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

1960.5.

(a) The State Commission on Juvenile Justice, pursuant to Section 1798.5, shall develop a Juvenile Justice Operational Master Plan. On or before January 1, 2009, the commission shall develop and make available for implementation by the counties the following strategies:

(1) Risk and needs assessment tools to evaluate the programming and security needs of all youthful offenders and at-risk youth.

(2) Juvenile justice universal data collection elements, which shall be common to all counties.

(3) Criteria and strategies to promote a continuum of evidence-based responses to youthful offenders.

(b) In drafting the Juvenile Justice Operational Master Plan, the commission shall take into consideration both of the following:

(1) Evidence-based programs and risk and needs assessment tools currently in use by the counties.

(2) The costs of implementing these strategies.

(c) On or before May 1, 2008, the commission shall provide an interim report to the Legislature, which shall include the status of the work of the commission and the strategies it has identified to date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 30.   Effective August 24, 2007.   Operative September 1, 2007, by Sec. 37 of Ch. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

1961.

(a) On or before May 1 of each year, each county shall prepare and submit to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration a Juvenile Justice Development Plan on its proposed programs, strategies, and system enhancements for the next fiscal year from the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund described in Section 1951. The plan shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the programs, placements, services, strategies, and system enhancements to be funded by the block grant allocation pursuant to this chapter, including, but
 not limited to, the programs, tools, and strategies outlined in Section 1960.

(2) A description of how the plan relates to or supports the county’s overall strategy for dealing with youthful offenders who have not committed an offense described in subdivision (b) of Section 707, and who are no longer eligible for commitment to the Division of Juvenile Facilities under former Section 733 as of September 1, 2007.

(3) A description of any regional agreements or arrangements to be supported by the block grant allocation pursuant to this chapter.

(4) A description of how the programs, placements, services, or strategies identified in the plan coordinate with multiagency juvenile justice plans and programs under
 paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 30061 of the Government Code.

(b) The plan described in subdivision (a) shall be submitted to the
 Office of Youth and Community Restoration in a format, as specified by the office, that consolidates the form for submission of the plan with the form for submission of the multiagency juvenile justice plan to be developed and submitted to the
 office as provided by paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 30061 of the Government Code.

(c) Each county receiving an allocation from the Youthful Offender Block Grant Fund described in Section 1951 shall, by October 1 of each year, submit an annual report to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration on its utilization of the block grant funds in the preceding fiscal year. The report shall be in a format specified by the office that consolidates the report required by
 this subdivision with the annual report required to be submitted to the
 office under the provisions of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 30061 of the Government Code, and shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the programs, placements, services, strategies, and system enhancements supported by block grant funds in the preceding fiscal year, and an accounting of all of the county’s expenditures of block grant funds for the preceding fiscal year.

(2) A description and expenditure report for programs, strategies, and system enhancements that have been cofunded during the preceding fiscal year using funds provided under this chapter and juvenile justice funds provided under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 30061 of the Government Code.

(3) Countywide juvenile justice trend data available
 from existing statewide juvenile justice data systems or networks, as specified by the
 office, including, but not limited to, arrests, diversions, petitions filed, petitions sustained, placements, incarcerations, subsequent petitions and probation violations, and including, in a format to be specified by the office, a summary description or analysis, based on available information, of how the programs, strategies, and system enhancements funded pursuant to this chapter have or may have contributed to, or influenced, the juvenile justice data trends identified in the report.

(d) The office shall
 prepare and make available to the public on its internet website summaries of the annual county reports submitted in accordance with subdivision (c). By March 1 of each year, the office also shall prepare and submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report summarizing county utilizations of block grant funds in the preceding fiscal year, including a summary of the programs, strategies, system enhancements, and related expenditures made by each county utilizing Youthful Offender Block Grant funds. The annual report to the Governor and the Legislature shall also summarize the countywide trend data and any
 other pertinent information submitted by counties indicating how the programs, strategies, and system enhancements supported by Youthful Offender Block Grant funds have or may have contributed to, or influenced, the trends identified. The office may consolidate the annual report to the Governor and the Legislature required under this section with the annual report required by subparagraph (E) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 30061 of the Government Code. The annual report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The annual report shall also be posted for access by the public on the
 office’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 7.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1962.

The Office of Youth and Community Restoration may monitor the forms, documents, and information submitted by counties pursuant to Section 1961 and may advise counties and provide technical assistance on the implementation and requirements of Section 1961.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 8.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Local Youthful Offender Rehabilitative Facility Construction Grants [1970. - 1978.]

1970.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “participating county” means any county, or regional consortium of counties, within the state that has been certified to the board by the authority as having satisfied all of the requirements set forth in Section 1975 for financing a local youthful offender rehabilitative facility pursuant to this article.

(b) For purposes of this article, “board” means the State Public Works Board, and “authority” means the Corrections Standards Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 16, Sec. 15.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1971.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, a participating county, and the board are authorized to acquire, design, renovate, or construct a local youthful offender rehabilitative facility approved by the authority pursuant to Section 1975, or a site or sites owned by, or subject to a lease or option to purchase held by a participating county. The ownership interest of a participating county in the site or sites for a local youthful offender rehabilitative facility shall be determined by the board to be adequate for purposes of its financing in order to be eligible under this article.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 15815 of the Government Code, a participating county may acquire, design, renovate, or construct the local youthful offender rehabilitative facility in accordance with its local contracting authority. Notwithstanding Section 14951 of the Government Code, the participating county may assign an inspector during the construction of the project.

(c) The department, a participating county, and the board shall enter a construction agreement for the project that shall provide, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Performance expectations of the parties related to the acquisition, design, renovation, or construction of the local youthful offender rehabilitative facility.

(2) Guidelines and criteria for use and application of the proceeds of revenue bonds, notes, or bond anticipation notes issued by the board to pay for the cost of the approved local youthful offender rehabilitative facility project.

(3) Ongoing maintenance and staffing responsibilities for the term of the financing.

(d) The construction agreement shall include a provision that the participating county agrees to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the State of California for any and all claims and losses arising out of the acquisition, design, renovation, and construction of the local youthful offender rehabilitative facility. The construction agreement may also contain additional terms and conditions that facilitate the financing by the board.

(e) The scope and cost of the approved local youthful offender rehabilitative facility project shall be subject to approval and administrative oversight by the board.

(f) For purposes of compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), neither the board nor the department, shall be deemed a lead or responsible agency. The participating county shall be the lead agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 16, Sec. 16.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1972.
